src/fst/guesser-simplex-nouns.lexc
LEXICON EndAK
  @D.Stress@                   GuessKABINET ;     ! n<et>
!  @D.Stress@                   GuessFIAT ;       ! n<et> võiks olla
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessKABINET ;     ! ka-bin-<et>
  @R.Stress.On@@D.Len.III@     GuessREDEL ;       ! ag-<at>
  @R.Stress.On@@R.Len.III@     GuessKABINET ;     !  alksr-at

LEXICON EndAL
  @D.Stress@                   GuessTAUD ;      ! n<el>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessTAUD ;      ! se-min-<ar>
  @R.Stress.On@                GuessREDEL ;     ! ag-<am>, aarstl-am

LEXICON IsKAVA
  @D.Stress@                   GuessKAVA ;     ! kava

LEXICON Endik
  @D.Stress@                   GuessKABINET ;     ! n<ik>
  @D.Stress@                   GuessFIAT ;       ! n<ik> 
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessELANIK ;     ! ka-bin-<ik>
  @R.Stress.On@@D.Len.III@     GuessVIRSIK ;       ! ab-<ik>
  @R.Stress.On@@R.Len.III@     GuessELANIK ;     !  alksr-ik

LEXICON Endel
  @D.Stress@                   GuessTAUD ;     ! n<el>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessTAUD ;     ! ka-bin-<el>
  @R.Stress.On@@D.Len.I@       GuessGOSPEL ;       ! ab-<el>
  @R.Stress.On@@R.Len.I@       GuessREDEL ;     !  al-el

LEXICON Ender
  Endel ;

LEXICON Ending
  @D.Stress@                   GuessTAUD ;     ! p<ing>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessTAUD ;     ! ka-bin-<ing>
  @R.Stress.On@@D.Len.III@     GuessVIRSIK ;       ! ab-<ing>
  @R.Stress.On@@R.Len.III@     GuessTAUD ;     !  alksr-ing

LEXICON EndTwoCons
  @D.Stress@                   GuessTAUD ;     ! p<ist>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessTAUD ;     ! ka-bin-<its>
  @R.Stress.On@@D.Len.III@     GuessREDEL ;       ! ab-<irt>
  @R.Stress.On@@R.Len.III@     GuessTAUD ;     !  alksr-its


LEXICON IsRABELEMA
  @D.Stress@@P.Part.One@       GuessRABELEMA ;     ! rabelema  @P.Part.One@ vajab lõppude lisamise programm

LEXICON IsHAKLEMA          ! kahtlane...
  @P.Part.One@                 GuessHAKKAMA ;     ! 
!  @P.Part.One@                 GuessHAKKAMA ;     ! ??? 

LEXICON IsHAKKAMA
  @D.Stress@@P.Part.One@           GuessHAKKAMA ;     ! 
  @R.Stress.Off@@P.Part.One@       GuessHAKKAMA ;     ! ??? 

LEXICON IsLEPPIMA
  @D.Stress@@P.Part.One@           GuessLEPPIMA ;     ! 
  @R.Stress.Off@@P.Part.One@       GuessLEPPIMA ;     ! 

LEXICON IsLEPPUMA
  @D.Stress@@P.Part.One@           GuessLEPPIMA ;     ! 

LEXICON IsELAMA
  @D.Stress@@P.Part.One@           GuessELAMA ;     ! 
  @R.Stress.Off@@P.Part.One@       GuessELAMA ;     ! 

LEXICON EndELAMA
  @R.Stress.On@@P.Part.One@        GuessELAMA ;     ! 


LEXICON GuessLane   
    +Guess: LANE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessLine   
    +Guess: LINE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessMine   
    +Guess: MINE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessNe   
    +Guess: NE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

!LEXICON GuessUs   
!    +Guess: US_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessOluline
    +Guess+A: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessOlulane   
    +Guess+N: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessARMEE
   +Guess+N: ARMEE ;

LEXICON GuessNameARMEE
   +Guess+N+Prop: ARMEE ;

LEXICON GuessKAVA
   +Guess+N: KAVA ;

LEXICON GuessNameKAVA
   +Guess+N+Prop: KAVA ;

LEXICON GuessAASTA
   +Guess+N: AASTA ;

LEXICON GuessNameAASTA
   +Guess+N+Prop: AASTA ;

LEXICON GuessPERE
   +Guess+N: PERE ;

LEXICON GuessNamePERE
   +Guess+N+Prop: PERE ;

LEXICON GuessPEENIKE
   +Guess+N: PEENIKE ;
   +Guess+A: PEENIKE ;

LEXICON GuessOLULINE
   +Guess+A: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessNameOLULINE
   +Guess+N+Prop: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessSOOLANE
   +Guess+A: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessMAALANE
   +Guess+N: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessNameSOOLANE
   +Guess+N+Prop: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessOLULIS
   +Guess+N: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessNameOLULIS
   +Guess+N+Prop: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessSOOLAS
   +Guess+N: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessNameSOOLAS
   +Guess+N+Prop: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessMUUSEUM
   +Guess+N: MUUSEUM ;

LEXICON GuessNameMUUSEUM
   +Guess+N+Prop: MUUSEUM ;

LEXICON GuessELANIK
   +Guess+N: ELANIK ;

LEXICON GuessLIK
   +Guess+A: ELANIK ;

LEXICON GuessNameELANIK
   +Guess+N+Prop: ELANIK ;

LEXICON GuessVIRSIK
   +Guess+N: VIRSIK ;

LEXICON GuessNameVIRSIK
   +Guess+N+Prop: VIRSIK ;

LEXICON GuessKABINET
   +Guess+N: KABINET ;

LEXICON GuessNameKABINET
   +Guess+N+Prop: KABINET ;
   +Guess+N+Prop: FIAT ;   ! ?? no change in orthography

LEXICON GuessMAGUS
   +Guess+N: MAGUS ;

LEXICON GuessNameMAGUS
   +Guess+N+Prop: MAGUS ;

LEXICON GuessLOHAKAS
   +Guess+A: LOHAKAS ;

LEXICON GuessREDEL
   +Guess+N: REDEL ;

LEXICON GuessNameREDEL
   +Guess+N+Prop: REDEL ;

LEXICON GuessGOSPEL
   +Guess+N: GOSPEL ;

LEXICON GuessPINGE
   +Guess+N: PINGE ;

LEXICON GuessSUULINE
   +Guess+N: SUULINE ;

LEXICON GuessFIAT
   +Guess+N: FIAT ;

LEXICON GuessTAUD
   +Guess+N: TAUD ;

LEXICON GuessNameTAUD
   +Guess+N+Prop: TAUD ;
   +Guess+N+Prop: FIAT ;   ! ?? no change in orthography

LEXICON GuessRABELE
  @R.POS.V@ GuessRABELEMA ;

LEXICON GuessRABELEMA
 ma+Guess+V: RABELEMA ;

LEXICON GuessHAKKA
  @R.POS.V@ GuessHAKKAMA ;

LEXICON GuessHAKKAMA
   ma+Guess+V: HAKKAMA ;

LEXICON GuessLEPPI
  @R.POS.V@ GuessLEPPIMA ;

LEXICON GuessLEPPIMA
   ma+Guess+V: LEPPIMA ;

LEXICON GuessELA
  @R.POS.V@ GuessELAMA ;

LEXICON GuessELAMA
   ma+Guess+V: ELAMA ;

LEXICON GuessKOND
   +Guess+N:%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;

LEXICON GuessNameKOND
   +Guess+N+Prop:%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;

LEXICON GuessNameAPO
   +Guess+N+Prop: TAUD ;
   +Guess+N+Prop: REDEL ;   
   +Guess+N+Prop: ARMEE ;   
